Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1010.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER 7A Sec. 79b. As used in this chapter: (a) "Administrator" means the small business administrator who serves as the head of the office as described in section 79c. (b) "Office of small business growth" or "office", unless the context clearly implies a different meaning, means the office of small business growth created in section 79c. (c) "Small business" means a business concern incorporated or doing business in this state, including the affiliates of the business concern, that is independently owned and operated and that employs fewer than 500 full-time employees. Sec. 79c. (1) The office of small business growth is created in the fund. The office shall provide support for small businesses as described in this chapter. (2) The head of the office of small business growth is the small business administrator, who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. (3) The individual appointed administrator must be qualified by training and experience to perform the duties and exercise the powers of the administrator and the office as provided in this chapter. (4) The governor may remove the administrator from office for cause, including, but not limited to, incompetence, official misconduct, habitual or willful neglect of duty, or other misfeasance or malfeasance in connection with the operation of the office. If the administrator is removed from office, the governor shall report the reason for the removal to the legislature. (5) The administrator shall not be actively involved in political party activities or publicly endorse, solicit funds for, or make contributions to political parties or candidates for elective office. The administrator shall not engage in any other occupation, business, or profession likely to detract from the full-time performance of the individual's duties as administrator or to result in a conflict of interest or an appearance of impropriety or partiality. Sec. 79d. (1) The office of small business growth shall do all of the following: (a) Facilitate the creation, growth, and retention of small business jobs in this state. (b) Coordinate programs across state government that pertain to small businesses and coordinate with other state agencies that provide services to small businesses to create a business-friendly environment that streamlines processes and promotes a positive customer service experience. (c) Create and maintain a 1-stop website that does all of the following: (i) Provides step-by-step instructions on the governmental requirements of how to start and operate a business in this state. (ii) Serves as a comprehensive resource of grants, loans, and other economic incentives available for small businesses in this state. (iii) Directs small businesses to the websites of all relevant business organizations and governmental entities governing their business based on location and type of business. (d) Aid and assist small businesses and entrepreneurs in this state. (e) Work to create a business environment that encourages and sustains entrepreneurship in this state. (f) Provide technical assistance to small businesses, including, but not limited to, guidance regarding business planning, regulatory compliance, financial management, marketing, operations, technology, and accessing capital. (g) Conduct statewide outreach to inform entrepreneurs and small businesses of the resources, programs, and services available to them in this state. (h) Seek additional funding through federal grants, philanthropic sources, and other avenues. (2) The office may do 1 or more of the following: (a) Administer programs for small businesses, including, but not limited to, loan, grant, or other financing or economic development programs. (b) Conduct workshops, seminars, and trainings for entrepreneurs and small businesses. (c) Identify and recommend changes to state statutes or rules that would benefit entrepreneurs and small businesses. (d) Take any other action that would assist small businesses and entrepreneurs in this state. (3) Any powers or duties of the fund pertaining to small businesses may be delegated to and exercised or performed by the office. Sec. 79e. (1) As part of its activities under this chapter, the office of small business growth shall collect and analyze data on program outcomes. (2) Not later than April 10 of each year, the office shall submit a report to the board, each member of the legislature, the governor, the clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the senate and house fiscal agencies regarding its activities in the immediately preceding state fiscal year, including a summary of the data collected under subsection (1).